West Virginia, session 2025, HB2924.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. LIMITATION OF ACTIONS AND SUITS. §55-2-1. Entry upon or recovery of lands. No person shall make an entry on, or bring an action to recover, any land, but within ten years next after the time at which the right to make such entry or to bring such action shall have first accrued to himself or to some person through whom he claims(a) A person may make an entry on, or bring an action to recover, any land at any time.(b) The doctrine and law of adverse possession is abolished in West Virginia. §55-2-3. Entry upon or recovery of lands by persons under disability. [Repealed.]